Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.181, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. State correctional institutionnew text begin and pretrial detentionnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end In order for a child to be detained at a state correctional institution for juveniles, the commissioner of corrections must first consent deleted text begin theretodeleted text end new text begin to the detentionnew text end , and the countynew text begin , as determined in paragraph (c),new text end must agree to pay the costs of the child's detention. new text begin (b) new text end Where the commissioner directs that a child be detained in an approved juvenile facility with the approval of the administrative authority of the facility as provided in subdivision 4 or section 260B.176, subdivision 2, the costs of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end detention shall be a charge upon the countynew text begin , as determined in paragraph (c),new text end for which the child is being detained. new text begin (c) When a child is detained in a county other than the county of the child's residence, the county requesting the detention shall pay for all pre-adjudication costs of detention. Once a child has been adjudicated delinquent, pursuant to section 260B.105, subdivision 2, any further costs of care shall be the responsibility of the county of financial responsibility as determined by chapter 256G. new text end